Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,111
Local government investment pool; authorized; restrictions.

An eligible entity may invest its funds and funds under its control through a local government investment pool if the governing body of the eligible entity by ordinance or resolution authorizes investment in the pool. A local government investment pool may only invest the funds it receives from eligible entities in eligible investments.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 33.